Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-908
Political subdivision; liability; no writ of execution; offer of settlement; effect.

Except as otherwise provided in the Political Subdivisions Tort Claims Act, in all suits brought under the act the political subdivision shall be liable in the same manner and to the same extent as a private individual under like circumstances, except that no writ of execution shall issue against a political subdivision. Disposition of or offer to settle any claim made under the act shall not be competent evidence of liability of the political subdivision or any employee or the amount of damages.

Laws 1969, c. 138, § 7, p. 629;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-2407;

Laws 1991, LB 15, § 6.